California statutes. Education Code
 pursuant to this section.

(i) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall report to the California Apprenticeship Council within 30 days of each apportionment period the following information, for each community college receiving reimbursement for apprenticeship instruction pursuant to this section:

(1) The number of apprenticeship instructional hours reported by and reimbursed to the community college as part of the budget formula developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5 or its successor section.

(2) At the final or recalculation apportionment, the hourly rate equivalent of per full-time equivalent student funding paid for instructional hours reimbursed to the community college as part of the budget formula developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of
 Section 84750.5 or its successor section.

(3) The information reported to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to subdivision (h).

(j) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall include instructions necessary to enforce this section in the audit report required by Section 84040. The instructions shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, procedures for verifying if the hours for apprenticeship instruction reported to each community college district by each community college receiving reimbursements for apprenticeship hours, pursuant to this section, are eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(k) When a community college contracts with an apprenticeship program sponsor in the building and construction trades, pursuant to subdivision (e), the
 apprenticeship program sponsor must approve any decision to seek reimbursement for classes pursuant to this section rather than pursuant to Section 79149.3. A community college may not condition its willingness to contract with an apprenticeship program sponsor in the building and construction trades, or to grant community college credit for a class provided by such a program, on whether reimbursement may or will be sought pursuant to this section rather than pursuant to Section 79149.3.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 26.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.2.

(a) An apprentice or preapprentice attending community college in classes of instruction pursuant to approved standards as provided pursuant to Section 3074 of the Labor Code and in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 3078 of the Labor Code or as authorized under Section 3100 of the Labor Code, shall be exempt from the requirements of any interdistrict attendance agreement for those classes.

(b) A community college shall be exempt from Section 55301 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations when establishing an apprenticeship course or program outside the territory of its community college district for nonresidents of that district when the participants in the class are indentured apprentices and the apprenticeship course or program is approved by
 the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 10.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.25.

A student enrolled in a community college class or classes pursuant to an apprenticeship training program or an internship training program who does not have a social security number may use an individual tax identification number for purposes of any background check required by the class or program. A student shall not be denied admission to an apprenticeship or internship training program because the student uses an individual tax identification number pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (SB 467)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.3.

(a) The reimbursement rate for related and supplemental instruction reimbursed pursuant to this article shall be established in the annual Budget Act and the rate shall be commonly applied to all providers of instruction specified in subdivision (e).

(b) Attendance of apprentices enrolled in any class maintained by a community college, pursuant to Section 3074 of the Labor Code, shall be reimbursed pursuant to this section only if reported separately to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and not reported pursuant to Section 79149.1. Attendance reported pursuant to this section shall be used only for purposes of calculating allowances pursuant to this section.

(c) For purposes of this
 section, each hour of teaching time may include up to 10 minutes of passing time and breaks.

(d) This section also applies to isolated apprentices, as defined in Section 3074 of the Labor Code, for which alternative methods of instruction are provided.

(e) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall make the reimbursements specified in this section for teaching time provided by community colleges.

(f) The hours for related and supplemental instruction derived from funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 79149 shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges directly to participating community colleges that contract with apprenticeship programs pursuant to subdivision (g).

(g) Reimbursements may be
 made under this section for related and supplemental instruction provided to indentured apprentices only if the instruction is provided by a program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(h) The initial allocation of hours for related and supplemental instruction pursuant to subdivision (f) at the beginning of any fiscal year when multiplied by the hourly rate established in the Budget Act for that year shall equal 100 percent of total appropriation for apprenticeships. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall notify participating community colleges of the initial allocation within 30 days of the enactment of the annual Budget Act.

(i) (1) If funds remain from the appropriation pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 79149, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall reimburse community colleges for unfunded related and supplemental instruction hours from any of the three previous fiscal years, in the following order:

(A) Reported related and supplemental instruction hours as described in subdivision (b) of Section 79149.5 that were paid at a rate less than the hourly rate specified in the Budget Act.

(B) Reported related and supplemental instruction hours that were not reimbursed.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall notify the California Apprenticeship Council of any reimbursements made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(j) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall report to the California
 Apprenticeship Council within 30 days of each apportionment period the following information for each participating community college:

(1) The number of related and supplemental instruction hours allocated to the community college.

(2) The number of related and supplemental instruction hours reported by the community college.

(3) At the final or recalculation apportionment, the hourly rate paid for related and supplemental instruction hours reported above the community college’s initial allocation of hours for related and supplemental instruction.

(k) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall include instructions necessary to enforce this article in the audit report required by Section 84040. The instructions shall include, but
 not necessarily be limited to, procedures for verifying if the hours for related and supplemental instruction reported to each community college district by a participating apprenticeship program sponsor, pursuant to this section, are eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 27.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.4.

For purposes of the California Firefighter Joint Apprenticeship Program, a class of related and supplemental instruction that qualifies for funding pursuant to Section 79149.3 includes, but is not necessarily limited to, a class that meets both of the following requirements:

(a) The class is conducted at the workplace.

(b) The person providing instruction is qualified, by means of education or experience, as a journeyman and shares the responsibility for supervision of the apprentices participating in the classes with the certified community college or adult education coordinator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 69.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.5.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, the California Apprenticeship Council, and the Superintendent, shall annually review the amount of state funding necessary to provide the reimbursements specified in Section 79149.3, and shall include an estimate of required funds in its budget for each fiscal year.

(b) If the amounts appropriated in any fiscal year are insufficient to provide full reimbursement, the hourly rate specified in Section 79149 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis only for reported hours that are in excess of the number of hours allocated at the beginning of the fiscal year so that the entire appropriation is allocated.

(c) If the amount appropriated is in excess of the amounts needed for full reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (h) of section 79149.3, any excess shall be allocated to community college districts to be used for the purpose of the state general apportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 28.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.6.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, in consultation with the Superintendent, shall jointly develop a model format for agreements between apprenticeship programs and community colleges for instruction pursuant to Section 3074 of the Labor Code.

(b) By March 14, 2014, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, with equal participation by local educational agencies and community college apprenticeship administrators, shall develop common administrative practices and treatment of costs and services, as
 well as other policies related to apprenticeship programs. Any policies developed pursuant to this subdivision shall become operative upon approval by the California Apprenticeship Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 71.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.7.

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, in consultation with the California Apprenticeship Council and the Superintendent, shall develop standard reporting protocols applicable to participating community colleges and local educational agencies contracting with apprenticeship program sponsors that include metrics to measure program efficiency and success. For programs contracting with community colleges, the reporting protocols shall include metrics to evaluate the impact of funding-related and supplemental instruction hours with full-time equivalent students pursuant to Section 79149.1 and training of apprentices funded with a noncredit rate pursuant to Section 79149.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 29.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cooperative Agencies Resources for Education Program [79150. - 79155.]

79150.

The Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges, in cooperation with the State Department of Social Services and the State Employment Development Department, may enter into agreements with community college districts, which, prior to July 1, 1984, established cooperative agencies resources for education programs, for the purpose of providing additional funds for support services for those programs. Support services shall include, but not be limited to, child care and transportation allowances, books and supplies, counseling, and other related services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

79151.

Each community college district specified in Section 79150 may apply for the funds pursuant to this article. Each district shall demonstrate that all existing resources have been exhausted, the number of new welfare recipients who will be served, and the extent of cooperation between the local county welfare department and the State Employment Development Department, the educational opportunity programs and services program, and campus child development programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1029, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

79152.

Participants in cooperative agencies resources for education programs shall be at least 18 years of age, be a single head-of-household, be receiving Aid to Families with Dependent Children, and be desirous of completing their high school education or pursuing a job-relevant curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1029, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

79154.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services and the State Employment Development Department, shall adopt guidelines for the cooperative agencies resources for education programs. The board of governors shall be responsible for the administration of the funds for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

79155.

For the 1983–84 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, this article shall be operative only if funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of the cooperative agencies resources for education programs pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 532.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.  CalWORKs Recipients Education Program [79200. - 79209.]

79200.

(a) There is in the California Community Colleges the CalWORKs Recipients Education Program.

 (b) As used in this article, “CalWORKs recipient” means a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or any successor program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 8.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79201.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to assist CalWORKs recipients prepare for employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 17.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

79202.

To the extent that funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, a community college shall receive funding for educational services provided to CalWORKs recipients based on the number of CalWORKs recipients that are enrolled at the community college and the scope and number of programs that the college plans to offer to assist CalWORKs recipients obtain employment. Prior to receiving funding, a community college shall submit to the chancellor a Request for Application which contains a plan for curriculum development or redesign. The plan shall include all of the following:

(a) Evidence that the curriculum will prepare students for an occupation that is in demand in the local labor market or that is in an emerging field that has documented employment potential.

(b) Participation by the county welfare department to establish that the programs being developed or redesigned will provide CalWORKs recipients with the training and experience necessary to secure employment, including intensive English language proficiency.

(c) Evidence of collaboration with local partners, such as employers, private industry councils, regional occupational programs, adult education providers, and affected counties in the development and design of the curriculum.

(d) Procedures to monitor CalWORKs recipients who complete the new curricula and transition into employment.

(e) A description of new courses for CalWORKs recipients that are designed to aid recipients with job-related advancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

79203.

To the extent that funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, funds received by a community college for curriculum development or redesign for CalWORKs recipients may be expended for all of the following purposes:

(a) To develop or redesign vocational curricula for CalWORKs recipients so that courses may be offered as part of a short-term intensive program, including Open Entry and Open Exit programs, and including intensive English language immersion.

(b) To link CalWORKs courses to job placement through work experience and internships.

(c) To redesign basic education and ESL classes so that they may be integrated with vocational training programs.

(d) To expand the use of telecommunications in providing the new curricula to CalWORKs recipients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 668, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

79204.

(a) In addition to the funding received pursuant to Section 79202, and to the extent that funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, a community college district shall receive funding for purposes of providing special services for CalWORKs recipients.

(b) Special services for CalWORKs recipients shall assist CalWORKs recipient students and those students transitioning off of CalWORKs in achieving long-term self-sufficiency through coordinated student services offered at a community college. Special services may include any of the services funded in accordance with subdivision (e).

(c) Services funded pursuant to this section shall be
 provided only to the following:

(1) Current CalWORKs recipients until their initial educational objectives are met.

(2) Former CalWORKs recipients for a period of not more than two years, subject to the conditions of Section 79208.

(d) Funds received for purposes of this section shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funds and services provided for CalWORKs recipients attending a community college.

(e) The chancellor shall develop an equitable method for allocating these funds to all community college districts based on the relative number of CalWORKs recipients in attendance in each district and shall allocate funds for the following purposes:

(1) Job placement.

(2) Coordination with county welfare offices and other local agencies, including, but not limited to, local workforce investment boards.

(3) Child care and workstudy.

(4) Instruction.

(5) Postemployment skills training and related skills training.

(6) Campus-based case management, limited to on-campus assistance and services not provided by county caseworkers that do not supplant other counseling and academic support services funded through existing California Community Colleges categorical programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 9.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204 for the purposes of subsidized child care shall be utilized only for children of CalWORKs recipients through campus-based centers or parental choice vouchers subject to rules consistent with those applied to related programs operated by the State Department of Education, including those rules relating to eligibility, reimbursement rates, and parental contribution schedules.

(b) Subsidized campus child care shall be provided to CalWORKs recipients only if they are engaged in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to Section 11320.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, through the completion of their initial education and training plan and for up to three months
 thereafter or until the end of the academic year, whichever period of time is greater.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204 for workstudy shall be used for payments to those employers that currently participate in campus-based workstudy programs or are providing work experiences that are directly related to and in furtherance of student educational programs and work participation requirements. Those payments shall not exceed 75 percent of the wage for the workstudy positions, and the employers shall pay at least 25 percent of the wage for the workstudy positions. These funds may be expended on behalf of a CalWORKs recipient only if the recipient’s total hours of education, employment, and workstudy meet the recipient’s obligations as specified in Section 11322.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 10.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79206.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204 may be used to provide additional sections of credit or noncredit classes for CalWORKs recipient students if the chancellor determines that a community college district is otherwise unable to offer the additional instructional services to meet the demand for CalWORKs students.

(b) The determination described in subdivision (a) shall be based on fall enrollment information and community college districts shall submit applications to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges by December 1 of each year.

(c) If the chancellor approves the use of funds for direct instructional workload
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by February 15 of each year that includes at least all of the following information:

(1) The enrollment of new CalWORKs recipient students.

(2) An explanation of why additional classes were needed to accommodate the needs of CalWORKs recipient students.

(3) An expenditure plan for the balance of these funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 11.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79207.

(a) As a condition of continued receipt of the funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204, by the fourth week following the end of the semester or quarter term commencing in January of each year, community college districts and colleges shall submit to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges a report, in the format specified by the chancellor, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) How the moneys received for the funded components of special services, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 79204, were spent.

(2) The number of
 hours of child care services provided.

(3) The average monthly enrollment of CalWORKs recipient dependents served in child care.

(4) The number of workstudy hours provided.

(5) The hourly salaries and type of jobs in which CalWORKs recipients were placed.

(6) The number of students receiving case management.

(7) The student participation rates, and other outcome data.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent practicable, reporting from colleges utilize data gathered for federal reporting requirements at the state and local level.

(c) The
 Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall compile the information received pursuant to subdivision (a) for annual reports to the Legislature, Governor, the Legislative Analyst, the Department of Finance, and the State Department of Social Services, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, by February 15 of each year.

(d) A report to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 12.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79208.

(a) First priority for expenditures of any funds allocated in Section 79204 shall be for the support of current CalWORKs recipients.

(b) If the needs of current CalWORKs recipients are insufficient to fully utilize all of the funding allocated pursuant to Section 79204 in a cost-effective way, the chancellor, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, may allocate a portion of the funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204 for the purpose of providing postemployment services to former CalWORKs recipients.

(c) Prior to an allocation of funds for postemployment services pursuant to subdivision (b), the chancellor shall
 secure the approval of the Department of Finance for the allocations, complete a cumulative report on the outcomes, activities, and cost-effectiveness of the program of funding specified in Section 79204 no later than February 15 of each year, and provide the rationale and justification for the proposed allocation of funds for postemployment services by community college districts for former CalWORKs recipients.

(d) Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be used only for former CalWORKs recipients who have been off of cash assistance for not longer than two years to assist them in upgrading skills, job retention, and advancement, by means of one or more of the following:

(1) Direct instruction that cannot be funded by other means.

(2) Child care to support attendance in classes consistent with this article
 for periods commensurate with a student’s need for postemployment training within the two-year period.

(3) Job development and placement services.

(4) Career counseling and assessment activities that cannot be funded through other programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 13.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79209.

(a) If a community college district is unable to fully expend its share of funds allocated for child care pursuant to Section 79204, it may request that the chancellor approve a reallocation to other CalWORKs purposes authorized by this article, subject to all pertinent limitations and any district match required for those purposes.

(b) Funds allocated pursuant to Section 79204 shall be budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance of effort requirement pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193) and may not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable
 maintenance of effort expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 14.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Grants for Worksite-Based Training Programs [79210. - 79210.]

79210.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall award grants to community college districts for the purpose of developing curricula and pilot programs that provide training to licensed nurses, including, but not necessarily limited to, training in the following nursing specialty areas:

(1) Critical care.

(2) Emergency.

(3) Obstetrics.

(4) Pediatrics.

(5) Neonatal intensive care.

(6) Operating room.

(b) A grant application shall include all of the following:

(1) Demonstration that a shortage of trained nurses in the areas listed in subdivision (a) exists in the region served by the applicant and a description of the manner in which the proposed program would reduce that shortage.

(2) Identification of hospital partners that have agreed to participate in the development of curricula and pilot programs. Participation by hospital partners shall include a one-to-one match in the form of any one or combination of the following:

(A) Direct financial support.

(B) Tuition, fee, or other reimbursement of students.

(C) Involvement of salaried nurse mentors, clinical nurse specialists, or other specialty prepared staff.

(D) Provision of paid clinical experiences for program participants.

(E) Use of equipment for training purposes.

(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall verify the grant agreement between local community college districts and their hospital partners, including the specific form of the one-to-one matching contribution described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Support Services for Foster Youth Attending Community College  [79220. - 79228.]

79220.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may enter into agreements with community college districts to provide, and allocate to selected community colleges within a community college district, funds for services in support of postsecondary education for foster youth. This program shall be known as NextUp, and shall expand the number of students participating in the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services and shall not displace other students. The funding provided under this article shall be separate and apart from the funding provided under existing cooperative agencies resources for education programs pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 79150). In addition to the delivery of Student Success and Support Program services, as described in Section 78212, services shall include, when appropriate, but not necessarily be limited to, outreach and recruitment, consultation and eligibility verification, consultation and referrals for students deemed ineligible, service coordination, counseling, book and supply grants, tutoring, independent living and
 financial literacy skills support, frequent in-person contact, career guidance, transfer counseling, childcare and transportation assistance, and referrals to health services, mental health services, housing assistance, and other related services.

(b) The program may provide all services specified in subdivision (a), and direct financial support, to enrolled students who meet all eligibility requirements but whose courses have not yet commenced, and who have completed required matriculation activities as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212, if those services are necessary to enable the student to be successful upon the commencement of the academic term.

(c) As used in this article, “program” means a NextUp program as may be established under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 29.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79221.

(a) A community college district that wishes to participate in this program shall submit a letter of interest to participate to the board of governors for funding pursuant to this article. An interested community college district shall certify that services provided under this article to eligible youth are coordinated with, and do not supplant, other services provided by the county and state.

(b) If the number of requests to participate exceeds the funding made available for the program, the board of governors shall prioritize the apportionment of funding to community colleges based on the number of eligible students and geographical equity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 30.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79222.

A student participant in the program shall meet both of the following requirements:

(a) Be a current or former foster youth in California whose dependency was established or continued by a court of competent jurisdiction, including a tribal court, on or after the youth’s 13th birthday.

(b) Be no older than 25 years of age at the commencement of the academic year in which the student
 first enrolls in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 5.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79223.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations that authorize the director of the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services at each community college to accept students who are enrolled in at least nine units into the NextUp program. Students enrolled in fewer than nine units may be accepted into the NextUp program if enrollment is part of an education plan designed to move the student toward subsequent enrollment in at least nine units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 6.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79223.5.

All current and former foster youth who meet NextUp eligibility criteria specified in Sections 79222 and 79223 are eligible to enroll in the NextUp program and shall not be required to meet additional eligibility requirements as a condition for enrollment in the NextUp program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 7.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79224.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, consistent with the requirements and intent outlined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 78215, and to the extent that a participating community college meets the responsibilities outlined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212, any student who participates in the program pursuant to this article participate in the program of services outlined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 771, Sec. 2.   (SB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2015.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79225.

(a) The board of governors, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall adopt regulations for the program. The board of governors shall be responsible for the administration of funds for the program. To the extent possible, the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and other advocates, shall consult with the chancellor’s office to ensure that services provided under this article to eligible youths are coordinated with, and do not supplant, other services provided by the county and state.

(b) Regulations adopted by the board of governors shall ensure that program application and enrollment processes implemented by
 community college districts are streamlined and do not impose barriers to entry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 8.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79226.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, commencing March 31, 2020, and every two years thereafter, the board of governors shall submit a report to the Governor, the education policy committees of the Legislature, and the California Child Welfare Council describing its efforts to serve students who are current and former foster youth. These biennial reports shall also include a review on a campus-by-campus basis of the enrollment, retention, transfer, and completion rates of foster youth, including categorical funding of those programs. The reports shall also include recommendations on whether and how the program under this article can be expanded to all community college districts and campuses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 722, Sec. 4.   (SB 12)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------

79227.

This article shall be operative in a fiscal year only if funds have been appropriated for purposes of this article for that fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 771, Sec. 2.   (SB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

79228.

The board of governors may authorize the chancellor, consistent with the requirements the board may impose, to designate up to 1 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this article for program administration, program development, and program accountability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 32.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   See ongoing operational condition prescribed in Section 79227.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Foster and Kinship Care Education Program [79420. - 79420.]

79420.

Funds appropriated to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for the Foster and Kinship Care Education Program shall be used for resource family education in accordance with the following provisions:

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate these funds exclusively for resource family education and training, as specified by the chancellor, in consultation with an advisory committee that includes resource parents, representatives of statewide foster parent organizations, parent and relative/kinship care providers, county child welfare services representatives, and representatives of the State Department of Social Services.

(b) If a community college district accepts funds for
 this program, the district shall comply with all reporting requirements, guidelines, and other conditions for receipt of those funds established by the chancellor.

(c) Each college receiving funds for this program shall have a plan, developed in consultation with the county child welfare agency, for resource family education that includes the provision of training to facilitate the development of foster family homes, as defined in Section 56155.5, that care for no more than six children who have special mental, emotional, developmental, or physical needs.

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall facilitate the participation of county welfare departments in the Foster and Kinship Care Education Program.

(e) For purposes of this section, “resource family” has the same meaning as defined in Section 16519.5 of
 the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 6.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Advanced Placement Credit [79500. - 79500.]

79500.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, in collaboration with the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges, do both of the following:
